Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.565

Removal of conservator—Appointment of successor.

(1) The court may remove a conservator for failure to perform the conservator's duties or other good cause and appoint a successor conservator to assume the duties of the conservator.

(2) The court shall hold a hearing to determine whether to remove a conservator and appoint a successor on:

(a) Petition of the individual subject to conservatorship, conservator, or person interested in the welfare of the individual which contains allegations that, if true, would support a reasonable belief that removal of the conservator and appointment of a successor may be appropriate, but the court may decline to hold a hearing if a petition based on the same or substantially similar facts was filed during the preceding six months;

(b) Communication from the individual subject to conservatorship, conservator, or person interested in the welfare of the individual which supports a reasonable belief that removal of the conservator and appointment of a successor may be appropriate; or

(c) Determination by the court that a hearing would be in the best interest of the individual subject to conservatorship.

(3) Notice of a hearing under subsection (2)(a) of this section and notice of the individual's right to be represented at the hearing by counsel of the individual's choosing must be given to the individual subject to conservatorship, the conservator, and any other person the court determines.

(4) An individual subject to conservatorship who seeks to remove the conservator and have a successor appointed has the right to choose an attorney to represent the individual in this matter. The court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees to the attorney as provided in RCW 11.130.100.

(5) In selecting a successor conservator, the court shall follow the priorities under RCW 11.130.415.

(6) Not later than fourteen days after appointing a successor conservator, the successor conservator shall give notice of the appointment to the individual subject to conservatorship and any person entitled to notice under RCW 11.130.420(6) or a subsequent order.

[ 2019 c 437 s 430.]